California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

4928.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 4928 renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 5.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4928.2.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Acupuncture Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4928.1 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 4.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4929.

Three members of the board shall be acupuncturists with at least five years of experience in acupuncture and four members shall be public members who do not hold a license or certificate as a physician and surgeon or acupuncturist. The acupuncturist members shall be appointed to represent a cross section of the cultural backgrounds of licensed members of the acupuncturist profession.

The Governor shall appoint the three acupuncturist members and two of the public members. All members appointed to the board by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member. Any member of the board may be removed by the appointing power for neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance in office, after being provided with a written statement of the charges and an opportunity to be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 659, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4930.

Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4931.

Each member of the board shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4933.

(a) The board shall administer this chapter.

(b) The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), regulations as may be necessary to enable it to carry into effect the provisions of law relating to the practice of acupuncture.

(c) Four members of the board, including at least one acupuncturist, shall constitute a quorum to conduct business.

(d) It shall require an affirmative vote of a majority of those present at a meeting of the board to take any
 action or pass any motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 47.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4933.5.

The board, by and with the approval of the director, may employ personnel necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 397, Sec. 4.   (SB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4934.

(a) The board, by and with the approval of the director, may appoint an executive officer who is exempt from the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 6.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4934.1.

(a) The Legislature requests the Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy to conduct a comprehensive analysis consisting of the following reviews and evaluations and shall report their findings and recommendations to the Legislature by September 1, 2004:

(1) Review and make recommendations on the scope of practice for acupuncturists.

(2) Review and make recommendations on the educational requirements for acupuncturists.

(3) Evaluate the national examination, administered by the National Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine, and make recommendations as to whether or not the national examination should be offered in California in lieu of, or as part of, the state examination.

(4) Evaluate and make recommendations on the approval process of the Accreditation Commission of Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine, the approval process of the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, and the board’s approval process.

(b) The board shall pay for all of the costs associated with the comprehensive analysis. An amount to pay for all of the costs associated with the comprehensive analysis, up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), is hereby appropriated to the board from the Acupuncture Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4934.2.

The board shall conduct the following studies and reviews, and shall report its findings and recommendations to the department and the Joint Committee on Boards, Commissions, and Consumer Protection no later that September 1, 2004:

(a) The board shall conduct a comprehensive study of the use of unlicensed acupuncture assistants and the need to license and regulate those assistants.

(b) The board shall study and recommend ways to improve the frequency and consistency of their auditing and the quality and relevance of their courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 33, Sec. 20.   Effective April 13, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Certification Requirements [4935. - 4949.]

4935.

(a) (1) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for any person who does not hold a current and valid license to practice acupuncture under this chapter or to advertise or otherwise represent that he or she is practicing or engaging in the practice of acupuncture.

(2) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for any person to fraudulently
 buy, sell, or obtain a license to practice acupuncture, or to violate the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, other than a physician and surgeon, a dentist, or a podiatrist, who is not licensed under this article but is licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), who practices acupuncture involving the application of a needle to the human body, performs any acupuncture technique or method involving the application of a needle to the human body, or directs, manages, or supervises another person in performing acupuncture involving the application of a needle to the human body is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) A person advertises or otherwise represents that he or she is practicing or engaging in the practice of acupuncture by the use of any title or description of services incorporating the words “acupuncture,” “acupuncturist,”
 “certified acupuncturist,” “licensed acupuncturist,” “Asian medicine,” “oriental medicine,” or any combination of those words, phrases, or abbreviations of those words or phrases, or by representing that he or she is trained, experienced, an expert, or otherwise qualified to practice in the field of acupuncture, Asian medicine, oriental medicine, or any other complementary or integrative medicine that involves acupuncture and is associated with an Asian subgroup, including Chinese medicine, Japanese medicine, or Korean medicine.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall not prohibit a person from administering acupuncture treatment as part of his or her educational training if the person is either of the following:

(1) Engaged in a course or tutorial program in acupuncture, as provided in this chapter.

(2) A graduate of an approved
 educational and training program and participating in a postgraduate review course that does not exceed one year in duration at an approved educational and training program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 596, Sec. 4.   (AB 3142)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4936.

(a) It is unprofessional conduct for an acupuncturist to use the title “Doctor” or the abbreviation “Dr.” in connection with the practice of acupuncture unless he or she possesses a license that authorizes the use or possesses an earned doctorate degree from an accredited, approved, or authorized educational institution as set forth under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code, which is in acupuncture, oriental medicine, a biological science, or is otherwise related to the authorized practice of an acupuncturist as set forth in Sections 4927 and 4937.

(b) The use of the title “Doctor” or the abbreviation
 “Dr.” by an acupuncturist as authorized in subdivision (a) without further indicating the type of license or degree which authorizes that use shall constitute unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 326, Sec. 1.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4937.

An acupuncturist’s license authorizes the holder thereof:

(a) To engage in the practice of acupuncture.

(b) To perform or prescribe the use of Asian massage, acupressure, breathing techniques, exercise, heat, cold, magnets, nutrition, diet, herbs, plant, animal, and mineral products, and dietary supplements to promote, maintain, and restore health. Nothing in this section prohibits any person who does not possess an acupuncturist’s license or another license as a healing arts practitioner from performing, or prescribing the use of any modality listed in this subdivision.

(c) For purposes of this section, a “magnet” means a mineral or metal that produces a magnetic field without the application of an electric current.

(d) For purposes of this section, “plant, animal, and mineral products” means naturally occurring substances of plant, animal, or mineral origin, except that it does not include synthetic compounds, controlled substances or dangerous drugs as defined in Sections 4021 and 4022, or a controlled substance listed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, “dietary supplement” has the same meaning as defined in subsection (ff) of Section 321 of Title 21 of the United States Code, except that dietary supplement does not include controlled substances or dangerous drugs as defined in Section 4021 or 4022, or a controlled substance listed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 649, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4938.

(a) The board shall issue a license to practice acupuncture to any person who makes an application and meets the following requirements:

(1) Is at least 18 years of age.

(2) Furnishes satisfactory evidence of completion of one of the following:

(A) (i) An approved educational and training program.

(ii) If an applicant began an educational and training program at a school or college that submitted a letter of intent to pursue accreditation to, or attained candidacy status from, the Accreditation
 Commission for Acupuncture and
 Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity, but the commission subsequently denied the school or college candidacy status or accreditation, respectively, the board may review and evaluate the educational training and clinical experience to determine whether to waive the requirements set forth in this subdivision with respect to that applicant.

(B) Satisfactory completion of a tutorial program in the practice of an acupuncturist that is approved by the board.

(C) In the case of an applicant who has completed education and training outside the United States, documented educational training and clinical experience that meets the standards established pursuant to Sections 4939 and 4941.

(3) Passes a written
 examination administered by the board that tests the applicant’s ability, competency, and knowledge in the practice of an acupuncturist. The written examination shall be developed by the Office of Professional Examination Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(4) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(5) Completes a clinical internship training program approved by the board. The clinical internship training program shall not exceed nine months in duration and shall be located in a clinic in this state that is an approved educational and training program. The length of the clinical internship shall depend upon the grades received in the examination and the clinical training already satisfactorily completed by the individual
 prior to taking the examination. The purpose of the clinical internship training program shall be to ensure a minimum level of clinical competence.

(b) Each applicant who qualifies for a license shall pay, as a condition precedent to its issuance and in addition to other fees required, the initial licensure fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 7.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4939.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “approved credential evaluation service” means an agency or organization that is approved by the board to evaluate education completed outside the United States and identify the equivalency of that education to education completed within the United States.

(b) If an applicant completes education outside of the United States, the
 applicant shall do both of the following:

(1) Submit documentation of his or her education to a board-approved credential evaluation service for evaluation.

(2) Have the results of the evaluation sent directly from the credential evaluation service to the board.

(c) If the board receives the results of an applicant’s evaluation pursuant to subdivision (b), the board shall examine the
 results and determine whether the applicant meets requirements for licensure. If the evaluated education is not sufficient to meet the requirements for licensure, the board may offer the applicant additional education, training, or standardized testing to satisfy the educational requirements. The board shall not require the applicant to complete education, training, or testing that is not otherwise required of applicants who complete education or training within the United States.

(d) The board shall establish, by regulation, an application process, criteria, and procedures for approval of credential evaluation
 services. The regulations shall, at a minimum, require the credential evaluation service to meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Furnish evaluations written in English directly to the board.

(2) Be a member of a nationally recognized foreign credential evaluation association, such as, but not limited to, the American Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers or the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services.

(3) Undergo reevaluation by the board every five years.

(4) Certify to the board that the credential evaluation service maintains a complete set of reference materials as determined by the board.

(5) Base evaluations only
 upon verified authentic, official transcripts, and degrees.

(6) Have a written procedure for identifying fraudulent transcripts.

(7) Include in an evaluation report submitted to the board the specific method or methods of authentication for the transcripts, certification, degrees, and other education evaluated for the purposes of the report.

(8) Include in the evaluation report, for each degree held by the applicant, the equivalent degree offered in the United States, the date the degree was granted, the institution granting the degree, an English translation of the course titles, and the semester unit equivalence for each course.

(9) Have an appeal procedure for applicants.

(10) Provide
 information concerning the credential evaluation service to the board that includes, but is not limited to, resumes or curriculum vitae for each evaluator and translator, which includes biographical information, three letters of references from public or private agencies, statistical information on the number of applications processed annually for the past five years, and any other information the board may require to determine whether the credential evaluation service meets the standards under this subdivision and the board’s regulations.

(11) Provide to the board all information required by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Its credential evaluation policy.

(B) A complete list of terminology and evaluation terms used in producing its credential evaluations.

(C) A detailed description of the specific methods utilized for credential authentication.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 667, Sec. 6.   (AB 2190)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4940.

(a) The board shall establish standards for the approval of tutorial programs for education and training in the practice of acupuncture, that satisfy the requirements of Section 4938. The board shall also establish standards for the approved supervising acupuncturists.

(b) An acupuncturist shall be approved to supervise a trainee, provided the supervisor meets the following conditions:

(1) Is licensed to practice acupuncture in this state and that license is current, valid, and has not been suspended or revoked or otherwise subject to disciplinary action.

(2) Has filed an application with the board.

(3) Files with the board the name of each trainee to be trained or employed and a training program satisfactory to the board.

(4) Does not train or employ more than two acupuncture trainees at any one time.

(5) Has at least 10 years of experience practicing as an acupuncturist and has been licensed in this state for at least five years.

(6) Is found by the board to have the knowledge necessary to educate and train the trainee in the practice of an acupuncturist.

The amendments made to this section at the 1993 portion of the 1993–94 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not affect the approval of any supervising acupuncturist which has been issued prior to the effective date of those amendments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4941.

In reviewing applications for licensure based upon the completion of a tutorial program in acupuncture, the board may provide that credit is granted for relevant prior training and experience when that training or experience otherwise meets the standards set by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4944.

(a) The board shall have the authority to investigate and evaluate each and every applicant applying for a license to practice acupuncture and to make the final determination of the admission of the applicant to the examination, or for the issuance of a license, in conformance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The board shall investigate and evaluate each school or college applying for approval under Section 4939 and may utilize and contract with consultants to evaluate those training programs. This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2017.

(c) The board may delegate to the executive officer or
 other official of the board its authority under this section in routine matters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 397, Sec. 10.   (SB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4945.

(a) The board shall establish standards for continuing education for acupuncturists.

(b) The board shall require each acupuncturist to complete 50 hours of continuing education every two years as a condition for renewal of his or her license. No more than five hours of continuing education in each two-year period may be spent on issues unrelated to clinical matters or the actual provision of health care to patients. A provider of continuing education shall apply to the board for approval to offer continuing education courses for credit toward this requirement on a form developed by the board, shall pay a fee covering the cost of approval and for the monitoring of the provider by the board and shall set forth the following information on the application:

(1) Course content.

(2) Test criteria.

(3) Hours of continuing education credit requested for the course.

(4) Experience and training of instructors.

(5) Other information as required by the board.

(6) That interpreters or bilingual instruction will be made available, when necessary.

(c) Licensees residing out of state or out of the country shall comply with the continuing education requirements.

(d) Providers of continuing education shall be monitored by the board as determined by the board.

(e) If the board determines that any acupuncturist has not obtained the required number of hours of continuing education, it may renew the acupuncturist’s license and require that the deficient hours of continuing education be made up during the following renewal period in addition to the current continuing education required for that period. If any acupuncturist fails to make up the deficient hours and complete the current requirement of hours of continuing education during the subsequent renewal period, then his or her license to practice acupuncture shall not be renewed until all the required hours are completed and documented to the board.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568) by Stats. 2005, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4947.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the practice of acupuncture by a person licensed as a dentist or a podiatrist, within the scope of their respective licenses, if the licensee has received a course of instruction in acupuncture. This course material shall be approved by the licensing board having jurisdiction over the licensee. The board shall assist the licensing boards in providing information as requested by the individual licensing boards.

(b) The course requirement set forth in subdivision (a) shall not apply to a podiatrist or dentist who has completed a course in acupuncture, including a continuing education course, and has utilized acupuncture prior to July 1, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4948.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to make unlawful the activities of persons involved in research pursuant to Section 2075.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 11.5.   Section operative July 1, 1982, pursuant to former Section 4974.5.)
-------------------------------------------

4949.

The provisions of this chapter shall not prohibit an acupuncturist from another state or country, who is not a licensed acupuncturist in this state, who is the invited guest of a professional acupuncture association or scientific acupuncture foundation, an approved educational and training program, or a continuing education provider that is approved under Section 4945, solely from engaging in professional education through lectures, clinics, or demonstrations. The guest acupuncturist may engage in the practice of acupuncture in conjunction with these lectures, clinics, or demonstrations for a maximum of six months, but may not open an office or appoint a place to meet patients or receive calls from patients or otherwise engage in the practice of
 acupuncture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 397, Sec. 11.   (SB 1246)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [4955. - 4964.]

4955.

The board may deny, suspend, or revoke, or impose probationary conditions upon, the license of any acupuncturist who is guilty of unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Using or possessing any controlled substance, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, dangerous drug, or alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to the acupuncturist, or to any other person, or to the public, and to an extent that the use impairs the acupuncturist’s ability to engage in the practice of acupuncture with safety to the public.

(b) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of an acupuncturist, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof.

(c) False or misleading advertising.

(d) Aiding or abetting in, or violating or conspiring in, directly or indirectly, the violation of the terms of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department
 of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, regulations, and guidelines pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with healing arts boards within this division, including, but not limited to, the Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Dental Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

The board shall seek to ensure that licensees are informed of the responsibility of licensees and others to follow infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized
 safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases.

(f) The use of threats or harassment against any patient or licensee for providing evidence in a disciplinary action, other legal action, or in an investigation contemplating a disciplinary action or other legal action.

(g) Discharging an employee primarily for attempting to comply with the terms of this chapter.

(h) Disciplinary action taken by any public agency for any act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of an acupuncturist or any professional health care licensee.

(i) Any action or conduct that would have warranted the denial of the acupuncture license.

(j) The
 violation of any law or local ordinance on an acupuncturist’s business premises by an acupuncturist’s employee or a person who is working under the acupuncturist’s professional license or business permit, that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of an acupuncturist. These violations shall subject the acupuncturist who employed the individuals, or under whose acupuncturist license the employee is working, to disciplinary action.

(k) The abandonment of a patient by the licensee without written notice to the patient that treatment is to be discontinued and before the patient has had a reasonable opportunity to secure the services of another practitioner.

(l) The failure to notify the board of the use of any false, assumed, or fictitious name other than the name under which the licensee is licensed as an individual to practice
 acupuncture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 596, Sec. 6.   (AB 3142)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4955.1.

The board may deny, suspend, revoke, or impose probationary conditions upon the license of any acupuncturist if he or she is guilty of committing a fraudulent act including, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(a) Securing a license by fraud or deceit.

(b) Committing a fraudulent or dishonest act as an acupuncturist.

(c) Committing any act involving dishonesty or corruption with respect to the qualifications, functions, or duties of an acupuncturist.

(d) Altering or modifying the medical record of any person, with fraudulent intent, or creating any false medical record.

(e) Failing to maintain adequate and accurate records relating to the provision of services to their patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 714, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4955.2.

The board may deny, suspend, revoke, or impose probationary conditions upon the license of any acupuncturist if he or she is guilty of committing any one of the following:

(a) Gross negligence.

(b) Repeated negligent acts.

(c) Incompetence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 714, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4956.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of an acupuncturist is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this chapter.

The board may order a license suspended or revoked, or may deny a license, or may impose probationary conditions upon a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her pleas of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4959.

(a) The board may request the administrative law judge, under his or her proposed decision in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before the board, to direct any licensee found guilty of unprofessional conduct to pay to the board a sum not to exceed actual and reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case.

(b) The costs to be assessed shall be fixed by the administrative law judge and shall not in any event be increased by the board. When the board does not adopt a proposed decision and remands the case to an administrative law judge, the administrative law judge shall not increase the amount of any costs assessed in the proposed decision.

(c) When the payment directed in the board’s order for payment of costs is not made by the licensee, the board may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county where the administrative hearing was held. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any licensee directed to pay costs.

(d) In any judicial action for the recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(e) All costs recovered under this section shall be considered a reimbursement for costs incurred and shall be deposited in the Acupuncture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4960.

Disciplinary proceedings under this article shall be conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 11.5.   Section operative July 1, 1982, pursuant to former Section 4974.5.)
-------------------------------------------

4960.2.

The board in all cases of revocation shall certify the fact of the revocation, under the seal of the board, to the business licensing entity of the cities or counties in which the license of the acupuncturist has been revoked. The record of the revocation made by the county or city clerk shall be sufficient evidence of the revocation, and of the regularity of all proceedings of the board in the matter of the revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 714, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4960.5.

(a) A person whose license or registration has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period of not less than the following minimum periods has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license revoked or surrendered.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least two years for modification of a condition of probation.

(4) At least one year for early termination of probation of less than three years.

(b) The board may require an examination for that reinstatement.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 489, a person whose application for a license or registration has been denied by the board, for violations of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) of this chapter, may reapply to the board for a license or registration only after a period of three years has elapsed from the date of the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4961.

(a) (1)   Every person who is licensed to practice acupuncture in this state shall register, on forms prescribed by the board that may include an application for an initial license or for renewal of a license, each place of practice and apply to the board to obtain a wall license for each place of practice.

(2) A wall license shall be renewed biennially, coinciding with the license renewal date. A licensee with a wall license issued before January 1, 2021, shall not be required to apply for a new wall license until the licensee’s next license renewal date.

(3) If the licensee has no place of practice, the licensee shall notify the
 board of that fact on a form prescribed by the board. A wall license is not required to be posted when a licensee performs acupuncture treatments outside of the licensee’s place of practice. However, the licensee shall carry a pocket license during treatments outside of the licensee’s place of practice and make the pocket license available upon request.

(4) A licensee shall register each place of practice within 30 days after the date of the licensee being licensed by the board or the establishment of a new place of practice, whichever occurs first.

(b) (1) An acupuncturist licensee shall post a wall license issued by the board to the licensee in a conspicuous location in each place of practice at all times.

(2) If an acupuncturist licensee has more than one place of practice, the licensee shall obtain from the board a separate wall license for each additional location and post the assigned wall license at each location.

(c) A licensed acupuncturist shall not display any acupuncture wall license that is not currently active and valid.

(d) (1) If a licensee changes the location of a place of practice, the licensee shall apply for the change of location within 30 days of changing the licensee’s place of practice on forms prescribed by the board.

(2) If a licensee fails to apply for a new wall license with the board due to a change of location within the time prescribed by this subdivision, the
 board may deny renewal of the license.

(e) (1) A wall license is nontransferable.

(2) Any change to the registered location in connection with the wall license, such as moving, requires a new wall license, and the former wall license shall be returned to the board with a request for cancellation.

(3) The licensee shall apply to the board to obtain a new wall license using the forms prescribed by the board for the new wall license or change of location.

(f) (1) An acupuncturist shall be responsible for the acupuncture or any other practice specified under Section 4937 rendered pursuant to the license of the
 acupuncturist in each place of practice maintained by the acupuncturist.

(2) An acupuncturist maintaining more than one place of practice shall ensure that each place of practice is in compliance with the standards of practice requirements of this chapter.

(g) As used in this section:

(1) “Place of practice” means an acupuncture office where any act of acupuncture is practiced and includes a place of practice in which the applicant holds a proprietary interest of any nature whatsoever or in which the licensee holds any right to participate in the management or control thereof.

(2) “Wall license” means an official document that is issued by the board upon
 application for a place of practice and has a unique identification number that is specific to the location provided by the licensee in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 8.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4961.1.

(a) The board, or its designee, may, upon complaint, inspect any of the following:

(1) Any premise in which acupuncture services, as defined in Section 4937, are provided or reasonably suspected of being provided.

(2) Any place of practice registered with the board for which a wall license has been issued pursuant to Section 4961.

(3) Any clinic owned and operated by a school with an approved educational and training program, as defined in Section 4927.5.

(4) Any premise in which acupuncture services, as defined in Section 4937, are provided under a
 tutorial program, as defined in Section 4940. 

(b) All records required by law to be kept by an acupuncturist subject to this chapter, including, but not limited to, records pertaining to the provision of services to patients, shall be open to inspection by the board, or its designee, during an investigation initiated in response to a complaint that a licensee has violated any law or regulation that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action or issuance of a citation and fine by the board. A copy of all those records shall be provided to the board immediately upon request. 

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant the board jurisdiction over the practice of medicine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 9.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4962.
